Wyoming, session 2026, SF0013.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 19-9-403(e)(intro), (i), (ii),
(iv)(B) and (v) is amended to read:
19-9-403. Pay and allowances of officers and enlisted
persons in active state service and state active duty;
worker's compensation coverage for national guard members;
no pension denied by reason of service.
(e) There is created the Wyoming national guard
member referral incentive program. The purpose of the
program shall be to incentivize and maximize peer-to-peer
recruiting that results in a completed accession to the
Wyoming national guard by providing a referral bonus to
Wyoming national guard members, veterans of the Wyoming
national guard, current employees of the military
department or recruits beginning the enlistment process
with the Wyoming national guard who make a successful
referral. Administration of this program shall require
that:
(i) A Wyoming national guard member, veteran of
the Wyoming national guard, current employee of the
military department or recruit beginning the enlistment
process with the Wyoming national guard may provide the
identity and contact information of a person who the
member, veteran, employee or recruit believes would be an
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0013
ENROLLED ACT NO. 26, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
appropriate recruitment prospect using a form provided by
the Wyoming national guard, which includes the person's
name, contact information and any other information
required by the military department;
(ii) The military department shall keep a record
of all forms submitted under paragraph (i) of this
subsection. Upon the completed accession of a referred
person and to the extent sufficient funds are available,
the military department shall distribute a referral bonus
to the member, veteran, employee or recruit who provided
the successful referral. The military department shall not
distribute a referral bonus to a referring recruit until
the referring recruit has completed accession into the
Wyoming national guard;
(iv) As used in this subsection:
(B) "Referral bonus" means a monetary
payment set each calendar year by the adjutant general not
to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) one thousand
dollars ($1,000.00);
(v) This subsection is repealed effective July
1, 2026 2028.
Section 2. There is appropriated two hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($250,000.00) from the general fund to the
Wyoming military department for purposes of making referral
bonus payments authorized by W.S. 19-9-403(e), as amended
by this act. This appropriation shall be for the period
beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2028. This appropriation shall not be transferred
or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended,
unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0013
ENROLLED ACT NO. 26, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
revert as provided by law on June 30, 2028. It is the
intent of the legislature that this appropriation not be
included in the standard budget for the Wyoming military
department for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3